Utah statutes.
10-5-126.   Receipts for payments to town -- Filing copies.

The town treasurer shall give or cause to be given to every person paying money to the town treasury, a receipt or other evidence of payment therefor, specifying, as appropriate, the date of payment and on which account the payment was made and shall file the duplicate of the receipt, a summary report, or other evidence of payment in the office of the clerk.

